South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4045.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 4-9-36(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) Employ a chief librarian whose qualifications and credentials shall meet the certification requirements of the State Library Board, and who shall be responsible to the county library board for the administration of the program and the selection of library staff members required to carry out the functions of the library system. A county library board may not require or express a preference that a chief librarian, library director, or library employee: (a) be certified by the American Library Association, or its successor organization; or (b) have a master's degree from a program certified by the American Library Association, or its successor organization. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----